src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_LÂÂJJ
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_jj
! gradation: yes
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! similar_to N_ŠLAAJJ
!! !!FORMS
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! ** Yaml: __N-laajj__
!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			! lââjj
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: lââjj
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^CC2C A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: lââj
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ; 		!!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: lõjju
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) lâjj
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ; 	     			!!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: lââjjan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der/Dimin:%^VOWRaise%^CC2C%> N_PIISSUŽ ;	!!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: lõõjuž
+Der/Dimin:%^CC2C%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: lââjaž

!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V%^CC2C A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) lâj»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..


LEXICON N_RÄÄKK !!= * @CODE@ rääkk:rääkk
+N: NMN_RÄÄKK ;
LEXICON NMN_RÄÄKK
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_ss_type
! gradation: yes
! weak geminate
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! ** Yaml: __N-raakk__
!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: rääkk
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^KK2GG A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: rääǥǥ
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;  !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: rakku
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) räkk
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: rääkkan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der/Dimin:%^KK2GG%^VOWRaise%> N_PIISSUŽ ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: raaǥǥuž
+Der/Dimin:%^KK2GG%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: rääǥǥaž

!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^VV2V%^KK2G A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) räǥ»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..



LEXICON N_ÄLDD !!= * @CODE@ äldd:äldd
! 2.a.mono.cluster
+N: NMN_ÄLDD ;
LEXICON NMN_ÄLDD
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_xyy
! gradation: yes
!! N_LÄINN has been integrated here
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel -u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-aeldd__
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			!!= * @CODE@ (1) äldd
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!= * @CODE@ (1) äldd
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) ääld
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: raised
:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ (3) alddu
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ (5) äldd
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ;	   		    	!!= * @CODE@ (6) älddan

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der/Dimin:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY N_PIISSUŽ ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: aalduž (2009: 312-313)
+Der/Dimin:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: ääldaž


!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^XYY2XY A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;	  !!= * @CODE@ (10) äld
!! Sg_Loc_Px..


LEXICON A-STEM_SG-NOM !!= * @CODE@ (1)
SG-NOM ;
A-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
LEXICON A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM  !!= * @CODE@ (2)
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
:%>a SG-LOC ;
:%>a SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
+Use/NG: SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
 A-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
 A-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_NG ;
+Der/teʹm:»t%^1VOWẹm A_ČÂÂʹLMTEʹM ;

LEXICON N_PẸIGG !!= * @CODE@ peigg:pẹigg
+N: NMN_PẸIGG ;
