src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
aassilååkk:aassi#lååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
aassâmläinn:aassâmlä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
alggseidd:alggse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
bäskk:bä%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
ceʹrriǩmäivv:ceʹrriǩmä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
dataserdd:data#se%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
dommpuõccihåidd:dommpuõccihå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
dommseidd:dommse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
eeʹjjlååkk:eeʹjjlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
fleskk:fle%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
håurr:hå%^1VOWurr N_ÄLDD ;
innäimm:innä%^1VOWimm N_ÄLDD ;
interneʹttseidd:interneʹtt#se%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
jammjilååkk:jammjilååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
jeäʹrǧǧräidd:jeäʹrǧǧ#rä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
jieʹllem-mäinn:jieʹllem-mä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
jieʹrjpäskk:jieʹrjpä%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
jiiʹjjeståbdd:jiiʹjjes#tå%^1VOWbdd N_ÄLDD ;
jokkrääkk:jokk#rääkk N_RÄÄKK ;
jorbbäidd:jorbbä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
joukkpeiʹvvhåidd:joukkpeiʹvvhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
jueʹlǧǧbäskk:jueʹlǧǧbä%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
jueʹlǧǧpäskk:jueʹlǧǧpä%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
jäđvv:jä%^1VOWđvv N_ÄLDD ;
jõnnhåurr:jõnnhå%^1VOWurr N_ÄLDD ;
kapitalärvv:kapital#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
kartträidd:kartträ%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
kauppärvv:kaupp#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
koidd:ko%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
kooddlååkk:kooddlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
kookklõsnjoikk:kookklõsnjo%^1VOWikk N_ÄLDD ;
kođjj:ko%^1VOWđjj N_ÄLDD ;
korggtuärjjõsläinn:korggtuärjjõslä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
koʒʒnjeräldd:koʒʒnjerä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
kueʹddemläʹbǯǯ:kueʹddemlä%^1VOWʹbǯǯ N_ÄLDD ;
kääʹddesäldd:kääʹddesä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
käʹrrevräidd:käʹrrevrä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
kärǯǯ:kä%^1VOWrǯǯ N_ÄLDD ;
kådsnjeräldd:kådsnjerä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
kårjj:kå%^1VOWrjj N_ÄLDD ;
kåʹddäldd:kåʹddä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
kõskkseidd:kõskkse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
kõskkärvv:kõskk#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
kõõskmõs-seidd:kõõskmõs-se%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
leiʹnnpäidd:leiʹnnpä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
leäʹppåstt:leäʹpˈp#å%^1VOWstt N_ÄLDD ;
leʹpccpeʹlljhårtt:leʹpccpeʹlljhå%^1VOWrtt N_ÄLDD ;
lippšälgg:lippšä%^1VOWlgg N_ÄLDD ;
luâttärvv:luâtt#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
lâstt:lâ%^1VOWstt N_ÄLDD ;
lââʹssmäinn:lââʹssmä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
lââʹssväinn:lââʹssvä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
läidd:lä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
läinnmäinn:läinnmä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
läŋgg:lä%^1VOWŋgg N_ÄLDD ;
meeiʹnpärdd:meeiʹnpä%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
meârkkamäidd:meârkkamä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
mooččâdvuõđhåidd:mooččâdvuõđhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
muõrräitt:muõrrä%^1VOWitt N_ÄLDD ;
mäddvuäʹsttemläinn:mäddvuäʹsttemlä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
mäinn:mä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
mäʹhssem-mäinn:mäʹhssem-mä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
mååustpeʹrrjem-mäinn:mååustpeʹrrjem-mä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
narodlååkk:narod#lååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
narodväinn:narod#vä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
neʹttseidd:neʹttse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
njarggäldd:njarggä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
njeäʹšškäivv:njeäʹšˈškä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
njoikk:njo%^1VOWikk N_ÄLDD ;
oljjšäurr:oljjšä%^1VOWurr N_ÄLDD ;
ooumažräidd:ooumažrä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
ooumažärvv:ooumaž#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
ouddseidd:ouddse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
ouddsmääkk:oudd#smääkk N_RÄÄKK ;
ouddäirr:ouddä%^1VOWirr N_ÄLDD ;
ođđääiʹjlååkk:ođđääiʹjlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
peiʹvvhåidd:peiʹvvhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
pieʹccvââšš:pieʹcc#vââšš N_RÄÄKK ;
piânnairäidd:piânnairä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
piârpeiʹvvhåidd:piâr#peiʹvv#hå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
poikk:po%^1VOWikk N_ÄLDD ;
pokkumkäivv:pokkumkä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
pombbâlpäidd:pombbâlpä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
porrmõšräidd:porrmõšrä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
prääʹzniǩräidd:prääʹzniǩrä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
puäjpärkk:puäjpä%^1VOWrkk N_ÄLDD ;
puäʒʒhåidd:puäʒʒhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
puäʒʒlååkk:puäʒʒlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
puäʒʒäidd:puäʒʒä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
puõccihåidd:puõccihå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
päkkpäidd:päkkpä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
pääʹnnhåidd:pääʹnnhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
pääʹnnäldd:pääʹnnä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
päʹrnnlååkk:päʹrnnlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
pååʹštserdd:pååʹšt#se%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
roozzkäivv:roozzkä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
ruåđihåidd:ruåđihå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
ruʹvddäiss:ruʹvddä%^1VOWiss N_ÄLDD ;
räirr:rä%^1VOWirr N_ÄLDD ;
råånnäldd:råånnä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
skootthåidd:skootthå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
sokkäldd:sokkä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
spraykälkk:spraykä%^1VOWlkk N_ÄLDD ;
straŋggäidd:straŋggä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
sueʹlnnhâurr:sueʹlnnhâ%^1VOWurr N_ÄLDD ;
särgg:sä%^1VOWrgg N_ÄLDD ;
såitt:så%^1VOWitt N_ÄLDD ;
teâđserdd:teâđse%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
tillserdd:till#se%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
tuâjjmäinn:tuâjjmä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
tuâǥǥseidd:tuâǥǥse%^1VOWidd N_PẸIGG ;
tuõlddikäivv:tuõlddikä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
tämpp:tä%^1VOWmpp N_ÄLDD ;
täʹlvv-väinn:täʹlvv-vä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
tåbdd:tå%^1VOWbdd N_ÄLDD ;
veäʹnccmäinn:veäʹnccmä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
veäʹǩǩvuõttmäinn:veäʹǩˈǩ#vuõtt#mä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
virkkõõvvâmärvv:virkkõõvvâm#ä%^1VOWrvv N_ÄLDD ;
vueʹllvåurr:vueʹllvå%^1VOWurr N_ÄLDD ;
vuâppäirr:vuâppä%^1VOWirr N_ÄLDD ;
vuâđđhåidd:vuâđđhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
vuâđđlååkk:vuâđđlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
vuäʹbbvueʹssvuõttläinn:vuäʹbb#vuẹʹssvuõtt#lä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
vuäʹmmääiʹjlååkk:vuäʹmmääiʹjlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
vuõnjâmlaaiäldd:vuõnjâmlaaiä%^1VOWldd N_ÄLDD ;
väivv:vä%^1VOWivv N_ÄLDD ;
võõnâs-sätkk:võõnâs-sä%^1VOWtkk N_ÄLDD ;
ââʹnnemläinn:ââʹnnemlä%^1VOWinn N_ÄLDD ;
âʹbrr-rääšš:âʹbrr-#rääšš N_RÄÄKK ;
äidd:ä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
ärdd:ä%^1VOWrdd N_ÄLDD ;
äuʹǩǩ-kälvv:äuʹǩǩ-kä%^1VOWlvv N_ÄLDD ;
ääiʹjlååkk:ääiʹjlååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
äävhåidd:äävhå%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
čackkeemvärjj:čackkeemvä%^1VOWrjj N_ÄLDD ;
čueǯǯtemäidd:čueǯǯtemä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
čåuʹjjläidd:čåuʹjjlä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
šnårkk:šnå%^1VOWrkk N_ÄLDD ;
šâʹlddvärjj:šâʹlddvä%^1VOWrjj N_ÄLDD ;
ǩeâlkkräidd:ǩeâlkkrä%^1VOWidd N_ÄLDD ;
ǩeäččlõslååkk:ǩeäččlõslååkk N_RÄÄKK ;
ǩiõttbäskk:ǩiõttbä%^1VOWskk N_ÄLDD ;
